Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Chapter 11. Conversion, Merger, Share Exchange, and Domestication
§ 11.16.
Effect of domestication.

When a domestication takes effect:

The domesticated corporation is for all purposes the corporation that existed before the domestication.

The property owned by the domesticating corporation remains vested in the domesticated corporation.

The debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticating corporation continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticated corporation.

An action or proceeding pending by or against a domesticating corporation continues as if the domestication had not occurred.

Except as prohibited by other law, the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the domesticating corporation remain vested in the domesticated corporation.

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of domestication, the terms and conditions of the plan of domestication take effect.

Except as otherwise agreed, the domestication does not dissolve a domesticating corporation for the purposes of this chapter 11.

A domesticated corporation that was a foreign corporation consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State to enforce a debt, obligation, or other liability the domesticating corporation owes, if, before the domestication, the domesticating corporation was subject to suit in this State on the debt, obligation, or other liability.
(b) (1) A domesticated corporation that was a foreign corporation consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State to enforce a debt, obligation, or other liability the domesticating corporation owes, if, before the domestication, the domesticating corporation was subject to suit in this State on the debt, obligation, or other liability.

A domesticated corporation that was a foreign corporation and not authorized to transact business in this State appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process for purposes of enforcing a debt, obligation, or other liability under this subsection.

A person shall serve the Secretary of State under this subsection in the same manner, and the service has the same consequences, as in section 5.04 of this title.

A corporation that domesticates in a foreign jurisdiction shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement surrendering the corporation’s certificate of organization that includes:

the name of the corporation;

a statement that the articles of incorporation are surrendered in connection with the domestication of the company in a foreign jurisdiction;

a statement that the corporation approved the domestication as required by this title; and

the name of the relevant foreign jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § E.1, eff. July 1, 2017.

§ 11.17.
Restriction on approval of conversion, merger, and domestication.

An approval or amendment of a plan of conversion, plan of merger, or plan of domestication under this chapter is ineffective without the approval of each interest holder of a surviving constituent who will have personal liability for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the organization, unless:

a provision of the organization’s organizational documents provides in a record that some or all of its interest holders may be subject to personal liability by a vote or consent of fewer than all of the interest holders; and

the interest holder voted for or consented in a record to the provision referenced in subdivision (1) of this subsection; or
(2) (A) the interest holder voted for or consented in a record to the provision referenced in subdivision (1) of this subsection; or

the interest holder became an interest holder after the organization adopted the provision referenced in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

An interest holder does not provide consent as required in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section merely by consenting to a provision of the organizational documents that permits the organization to amend the organizational documents with the approval of fewer than all of the interest holders.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § E.1, eff. July 1, 2017.

§ 11.18.
Chapter not exclusive.

This chapter does not preclude an organization from being converted, merged, or domesticated under law other than this title.

This chapter does not limit the power of a corporation to acquire all or part of the shares of one or more classes or series of another corporation through means other than those included in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § E.1, eff. July 1, 2017.